Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1318.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 702(b) of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 702. County and regional associations of boroughs.* * *(b) Appropriation.--A borough may annually appropriate [no more than $100] funds for the support of the county or regional association of boroughs.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.123456789101112131415